Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7918.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 46-13-22 of the General Laws in Chapter 46-13 entitled "Public
Drinking Water Supply" is hereby amended to read as follows:
46-13-22. Cross-connection control.
(a) The director is hereby authorized to adopt consistent statewide regulations governing
the content of cross-connection control plans and to require that all community public water
systems and all non-transient, non-community public water systems prepare a cross-connection
control plan. The purpose of these plans shall be to protect the public water system distribution and
transmission infrastructure from contamination through cross-connections. All community public
water systems and all non-transient, non-community public water systems shall certify to the
director that said plan complies with the regulations in accordance with the following schedule:
(1) Community and non-transient, non-community public water systems serving more than
five hundred (500) people shall submit certification of compliance no later than June 30, 2011, and
implement said plan immediately thereafter.
(2) Community and non-transient, non-community public water systems serving five
hundred (500) people or fewer shall submit certification of compliance no later than June 30, 2012,
and implement said plan immediately thereafter.
(b) The regulations governing cross-connection control plans adopted by the director shall
at a minimum include: the installation of cross-connection control valves at all newly constructed
service connections prior to the provision of water service; the installation of cross connection

control valves at all commercial and industrial service connections. The installation of cross-
connection control devices shall not be made a mandatory condition of a transfer of a residential
property that exists as of the effective date of this act [June 27, 2007].
(c) Public water supply systems shall be authorized to terminate water service to any
customer who fails to install the appropriate cross-connection control device upon due notice.
(d) The cross-connection control devices required to be installed shall be models approved
by the Foundation for Cross-Connection Control and Hydraulic Research of the University of
Southern California (FCCCHR, USC), the American Water Works Association (AWWA), and/or
the American Society of Sanitary Engineers (ASSE).
(e) The director may also adopt and enforce standards including the establishment of fees
for certification of persons engaged in cross-connection surveying or backflow prevention,
assembly training, repair and maintenance testing; provided, however, that no regulation or rule
shall be promulgated or enforced which requires the inspection or certification of any backflow
prevention device or system more frequently than once every ten (10) years except in response to
an emergency or public health situation.
(f) Any regulations and/or standards promulgated, amended and/or administered pursuant
to the provisions of this section shall conform to the requirements of chapter 35 of title 42 (“The
Administrative Procedures Act.”)
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005756
========
LC005756 - Page 2 of 3